Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20212-1201.01
Commission; purposes.

The purpose of the commission is to provide statewide regulation of horseracing and games of chance as defined in the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act in order to prevent and eliminate corrupt practices and fraudulent behavior, and thereby maintain a high level of integrity and honesty in the horseracing industry of Nebraska and the operation of games of chance in Nebraska, and to insure that all funds received by the commission are properly distributed.

Laws 1980, LB 939, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 2.

Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, see section 9-1101.